Utah statutes.
4-15-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Balled and burlapped stock" means nursery stock which is removed from the growing site with a ball of soil containing its root system intact and encased in burlap or other material to hold the soil in place;

(2)  "Bare-root stock" means nursery stock which is removed from the growing site with the root system free of soil;

(3)  "Container stock" means nursery stock which is transplanted in soil or in a potting mixture contained within a metal, clay, plastic, or other rigid container for a period sufficient to allow newly developed fibrous roots to form so that if the plant is removed from the container its root-media ball will remain intact;

(4)  "Etiolated growth" means bleached and unnatural growth resulting from the exclusion of sunlight;

(5)  "Minimum indices of vitality" mean standards adopted by the department to determine the health and vigor of nursery stock offered for sale in this state;

(6)  "Nonestablished container stock" means deciduous nursery stock which is transplanted in soil or in a potting mixture contained within a metal, clay, plastic, or other rigid container for a period insufficient to allow the formation of fibrous roots sufficient to form a root-media ball;

(7)  "Nursery" means any place where nursery stock is propagated and grown for sale or distribution;

(8)  "Nursery outlet" means any place or location where nursery stock is offered for wholesale or retail sale;

(9)  "Nursery stock" means all plants, whether field grown, container grown, or collected native plants; trees, shrubs, vines, grass sod; seedlings, perennials, biennials; and buds, cuttings, grafts, or scions grown or collected or kept for propagation, sale, or distribution; except that it does not include dormant bulbs, tubers, roots, corms, rhizomes, pips; field, vegetable, or flower seeds; or bedding plants, annual plants, florists' greenhouse or field-grown plants, flowers or cuttings;

(10)  "Place of business" means each separate nursery, or nursery outlet, where nursery stock is offered for sale, sold, or distributed;

(11)  "Packaged stock" means bare-root stock which is packed either in bundles or in single plants with the roots in some type of moisture-retaining material designed to retard evaporation and hold the moisture-retaining material in place.

